Maine, session 132, LD1697.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §616-A, sub-§2, ¶A, as repealed and replaced by PL 2003, c. 452,
Pt. B, §6 and affected by Pt. X, §2, is amended to read:
A. A person may not violate this subchapter or a rule adopted pursuant to this
subchapter or Title 22, chapter 258‑A or a rule adopted pursuant to Title 22, chapter
258‑A. This paragraph does not apply to a private applicator as defined in Title 22,
section 1471-C, subsection 22 or a private applicator of general use pesticides as
defined in Title 22, section 1471-C, subsection 22-A. Except as provided in paragraph
B, the following penalties apply to violations of this paragraph.
(1) A person who violates this paragraph commits a civil violation for which a fine
of not more than $1,500 may be adjudged as follows.
(a) A fine of not more than $10,000 may be adjudged except as provided in
division (b).
(b) A fine of not more than $50,000 may be adjudged for an unauthorized
pesticide application in a case in which the preponderance of the evidence
demonstrates that the person who violated this paragraph benefited
substantially from the violation as determined by the board by routine technical
rule as described in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A. Clear and convincing
evidence that only one person benefited substantially from an unauthorized
pesticide application constitutes prima facie evidence that the person is
responsible for the unauthorized pesticide application.
(2) A person who violates this paragraph and is subject to a fine under
subparagraph (1), division (a) after having previously violated this paragraph and
having been subject to a fine under subparagraph (1), division (a) within the
previous 4-year period commits a civil violation for which a fine of not more than
$4,000 $75,000 may be adjudged. A person who violates this paragraph and is
subject to a fine under subparagraph (1), division (b) after having previously
Page 1 - 132LR0748(03)

violated this paragraph and having been subject to a fine under subparagraph (1),
division (b) within the previous 4-year period commits a civil violation for which
a fine of not more than $150,000 may be adjudged.
Sec. 2. 7 MRSA §616-A, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2011, c. 510, §1, is further
amended to read:
B. A private applicator, as defined in Title 22, section 1471‑C, subsection 22, and a
private applicator of general use pesticides, as defined in Title 22, section 1471-C,
subsection 22-A, may not violate this subchapter or a rule adopted pursuant to this
subchapter or Title 22, chapter 258-A or a rule adopted pursuant to Title 22, chapter
258-A or a rule regarding records maintained pursuant to section 606, subsection 2,
paragraph G. The following penalties apply to violations of this paragraph.
(1) A person who violates this paragraph commits a civil violation for which a fine
of not more than $500 $1,000 may be adjudged.
(2) A person who violates this paragraph after having previously violated this
paragraph within the previous 4-year period commits a civil violation for which a
fine of not more than $1,000 $2,000 may be adjudged.
Sec. 3. Board of Pesticides Control to adopt rules. The Department of
Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Board of Pesticides Control shall adopt routine
technical rules as described in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter
2-A to:
1. Establish a penalty schedule for violations of the laws and rules governing pesticides
to create transparency for future penalties assessed;
2. Provide the means by which separate civil suits may be brought against the same
violator of the laws and rules governing pesticides if pesticide migration through soil or
bedrock occurs affecting more than one property;
3. Provide for the restoration of affected property and replacement of vegetation as
penalties for violations of the laws and rules governing pesticides in addition to monetary
penalties; and
4. Designate pesticides with the active ingredient tebuthiuron as state restricted use
pesticides.
Page 2 - 132LR0748(03)